Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-302
Government pending reorganization.

The government of a city shall continue, as organized at the date of the declaration of the Secretary of State under section 17-301, until the reorganization of the same under section 17-305.

Laws 1933, c. 112, § 2, p. 453;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-163;

R.S.1943, § 17-302;

Laws 2002, LB 729, § 6.

Upon decrease in population of a first-class city below five thousand inhabitants, the form of government continues until reorganization as second-class city. State ex rel. Cashman v. Carmean, 138 Neb. 819, 295 N.W. 801 (1941).